North Dakota, session 69, HB1086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 18-13-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
18-13-03. Certification and product change. (Contingent expiration date - See note)
1. Each manufacturer shall submit to the state fire marshal a written certification attesting that
each cigarette listed in the certification has been tested in accordance with section 18-13-02
and each cigarette listed in the certification meets the performance standard set forth in
subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 18-13-02.
2. Each cigarette listed in the certification must be described with the following information:
a. Brand or trade name on the package;
b. Style, such as light or ultra light;
c. Length in millimeters;
d. Circumference in millimeters;
e. Flavor, such as menthol or chocolate, if applicable;
f. Filter or nonfilter;
g. Package description, such as soft pack or box;
h. Marking approved in accordance with section 18-13-04;
i. The name, address, and telephone number of the laboratory, if different than the
manufacturer that conducted the test; and
j. The date that the testing occurred.
3. The certifications must be made available to the insurance commissioner for purposes
consistent with this chapter and the state tax commissioner for the purposes of ensuring
compliance with this section.
4. Each cigarette certified under this section must be recertified every three years.
5. For each cigarette listed in the certification or recertification, a manufacturer shall pay to the
state fire marshal an initial fee of two hundred fifty dollars. The state fire marshal may adjust
thisshall establish an annual fee annually to ensure the fee defraysdefray the actual costs of
the processing, testing, enforcement, and oversight activities required by this chapter. All fees
collected must be deposited in the insurance regulatory trust fund.

H. B. NO. 1086 - PAGE 2
6. There is established in the state treasury a special fund to be known as the Reduced Cigarette
Ignition Propensity and Firefighter Protection Act enforcement fund. The fund must consist of
all certification fees submitted by manufacturers, and, in addition to any other moneys made
available, be available pursuant to legislative appropriation, to the state fire marshal solely to
support processing, testing, enforcement, and oversight activities under this chapter.
7. If a manufacturer has certified a cigarette under this section and makes any change to the
cigarette which is likely to alter its compliance with the reduced cigarette ignition propensity
standards required by this chapter, that cigarette may not be sold or offered for sale in this
state until the manufacturer retests the cigarette in accordance with the testing standards set
forth in section 18-13-02 and maintains records of that retesting as required by section
18-13-02. Any altered cigarette that does not meet the performance standards set forth in
section 18-13-02 may not be sold in this state.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-01-07.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-01-07.1. Insurance regulatory trust fund established.
1. There is hereby created a trust fund designated "insurance regulatory trust fund". The
following amounts must be deposited in the insurance regulatory trust fund:
a. All sums received under section 18-13-03.
b. All sums received under section 26.1-01-07.
b.c. All sums received under section 26.1-01-07.2 from the insurance regulatory trust fund
investments.
c.d. All retaliatory fees imposed upon persons by the insurance department as authorized by
law.
d.e. All administrative penalties, fines, and fees collected by the commissioner from any
person subject to this title.
e.f. Any other amounts provided by legislative appropriation.
2. The moneys so received and deposited in the insurance regulatory trust fund are reserved for
use by the insurance department to defray the expenses of the department in the discharge of
its administrative and regulatory powers and duties as prescribed by law subject to the
applicable laws relating to the appropriations of state funds and to the deposit and expenditure
of state moneys. The insurance department is responsible for the proper expenditure of these
moneys as provided by law.
3. Except as otherwise provided by law, after the fiscal year has been closed and all expenses
relating to the fiscal year have been accounted for, the office of management and budget shall
transfer any fund balance remaining in the insurance regulatory trust fund that exceeds one
million dollars to the general fund.
SECTION 3. REPEAL. Section 18-13-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 4. TRANSFER - REDUCED CIGARETTE IGNITION PROPENSITY FUND TO
INSURANCE REGULATORY TRUST FUND. The office of management and budget shall transfer any
remaining balance in the reduced cigarette ignition propensity fund to the insurance regulatory trust
fund on August 1, 2025.

H. B. NO. 1086 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1086.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 5 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State